Utah statutes.
53-1-304.   Division duties.

The division shall:

(1)  provide technical support for the department's various computer systems, including computer software, hardware, and networking support;

(2)  provide access to the National Crime Information Center, National Law Enforcement Telecommunication System, which provides electronic mail messaging capabilities to law enforcement agencies throughout the nation, and to National Commercial Driver License Information;

(3)  create information systems for public safety information;

(4)  provide programming support as required by the department;

(5)  design systems and programs to maximize the efficiency of the department;

(6)  provide law enforcement officers and criminal justice agencies access to public safety information that will assist in protecting the public; and

(7)  other duties as assigned by the commissioner.

